Massachusetts, session 194th, H1257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17S the following section:-
Section 17T. Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of
the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for
medically necessary functional repair or restoration of craniofacial disorders, with the exception
of coverage for cleft lip and cleft palate which is prescribed under section 17J , to improve the
function of, or to approximate the normal appearance or any abnormal structures caused by
congenital disease of anomaly. Coverage under this section shall include the necessary care and
treatment of ectodermal dysplasia, dentinogenesis imperfecta and amelogenesis imperfecta.
Coverage under this section shall not include cosmetic surgery or for dental or orthodontic
treatment unrelated to said congenital disease or anomaly. The benefits in this section shall not
of 5

be subject to any greater deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any
other benefit provided by the commission.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Q the following section:-
Section 10R. The division shall provide coverage for medically necessary functional
repair or restoration of craniofacial disorders; with the exception of coverage for cleft lip and
cleft palate which is prescribed pursuant to section 10G, to improve the function of, or to
approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures caused by congenital disease or
anomaly. Coverage under this section shall include the necessary care and treatment of
ectodermal dysplasia, dentinogenesis imperfecta and amelogenesis imperfecta. Coverage under
this section shall not include cosmetic surgery or for dental or orthodontic treatment unrelated to
said congenital disease or anomaly. The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater
deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by
the division.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47UU the following section:-
Section 47VV. Any blanket or general policy of insurance under section 110 that
provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and which is delivered, issued or
subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in or outside of the
commonwealth and any employees’ health and welfare fund that provides hospital expense and
surgical expense benefits and which is delivered, issued or renewed to any person or group of
persons in the commonwealth shall provide coverage for medically necessary functional repair
of 5

or restoration of craniofacial disorders; with the exception of coverage for cleft lip and cleft
palate which is prescribed under section 47BB, to improve the function of, or to approximate the
normal appearance of any abnormal structures caused by congenital disease or anomaly.
Coverage under this section shall include the necessary care and treatment of ectodermal
dysplasia, dentinogenesis imperfecta and amelogenesis imperfecta. Coverage under this section
shall not include cosmetic surgery or dental or orthodontic treatment unrelated to said congenital
disease or anomaly. The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater deductible,
coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by the insurer.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8VV, the following section:-
Section 8WW. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an
individual or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the
commonwealth shall provide coverage for medically necessary functional repair or restoration of
craniofacial disorders; with the exception of coverage for cleft lip and cleft palate which is
prescribed pursuant to section 8EE of this section, to improve the function of, or to approximate
the normal appearance of any abnormal structures caused by congenital disease or anomaly.
Coverage under this section shall include the necessary care and treatment of ectodermal
dysplasia, dentinogenesis imperfecta and amelogenesis imperfecta. Coverage under this section
shall not include cosmetic surgery or dental or orthodontic treatment unrelated to said congenital
disease or anomaly. The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater deductible,
coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by the insurer.
of 5

SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4VV the following section:-
Section 4WW. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for
medically necessary functional repair or restoration of craniofacial disorders; with the exception
of coverage for cleft lip and cleft palate, to improve the function of, or to approximate the normal
appearance of any abnormal structures caused by congenital disease or anomaly. Coverage under
this section shall include the necessary care and treatment of ectodermal dysplasia,
dentinogenesis imperfecta and amelogenesis imperfecta. Coverage under this section shall not
include cosmetic surgery or dental or orthodontic treatment unrelated to said congenital disease
or anomaly. The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater deductible,
coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by the insurer.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4NN the following section:-
Section 4OO. Any individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide
coverage for medically necessary functional repair or restoration of craniofacial disorders; with
the exception of coverage for cleft lip and cleft palate which is prescribed under section 4W of
this chapter, to improve the function of, or to approximate the normal appearance of any
abnormal structures caused by congenital disease or anomaly. Coverage under this section shall
include the necessary care and treatment of ectodermal dysplasia, dentinogenesis imperfecta and
amelogenesis imperfecta. Coverage under this section shall not include cosmetic surgery or
dental or orthodontic treatment unrelated to said congenital disease or anomaly. The benefits in
of 5

this section shall not be subject to any greater deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-
pocket limits than any other benefit provided by the insurer.
SECTION 7. Chapter 176I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 13 the following section:-
Section 14 An organization entering into a preferred provider contract shall provide
coverage for medically necessary functional repair or restoration of craniofacial disorders; with
the exception of coverage for cleft lip and cleft palate which is prescribed under section 12 of
this chapter, to improve the function of, or to approximate the normal appearance of any
abnormal structures caused by congenital disease or anomaly. Coverage under this section shall
include the necessary care and treatment of medically diagnosed congenital disease or anomaly,
including, ectodermal dysplasia, dentinogenesis imperfecta, and amelogenesis imperfecta.
Coverage under this section shall not include cosmetic surgery or dental or orthodontic treatment
unrelated to congenital defects, developmental deformities, trauma, tumors, infections or disease.
The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater deductible, coinsurance,
copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by the insurer.
of 5